Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,116
Indemnification of officers.

(MBCA 8.56) (a) A corporation
may indemnify and advance expenses under sections 21-2,110 to 21-2,119 to
an officer of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding because he or
she is an officer of the corporation:

(1) To the same extent
as a director; and

(2)
If he or she is an officer but not a director, to such further extent as may
be provided by the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, a resolution of
the board of directors, or contract except for:

(i) Liability in connection with
a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation other than for expenses
incurred in connection with the proceeding; or

(ii) Liability arising out of conduct
that constitutes:

(A)
Receipt by the officer of a financial benefit to which he or she is not entitled;

(B) An intentional infliction
of harm on the corporation or the shareholders; or

(C) An intentional violation of
criminal law.

(b)
The provisions of subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall apply to an officer
who is also a director if the basis on which he or she is made a party to
the proceeding is an act or omission solely as an officer.

(c) An officer of a corporation
who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section
21-2,112 and may apply to a court under section 21-2,114 for indemnification
or an advance for expenses, in each case to the same extent to which a director
may be entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under such provisions.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 116.